Illinois, session 104th, HB2841.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-102 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/1-102)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4151-102)7    Sec. 1-102. For the the purposes of this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires, the terms defined in this Article 9have the meanings ascribed to them herein.10(Source: P.A. 81-223.)